Utah statutes.
73-5a-701.   Notice of violation -- Order for corrective action.

(1)  If the state engineer determines that any person is violating any requirement of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, the state engineer shall serve written notice upon the alleged violator which:

(a)  specifies the violation; and

(b)  alleges the facts constituting the violation.

(2)  After serving notice as required in Subsection (1), the state engineer may issue an order for necessary corrective action and file an action in the appropriate district court.

